Rhode Island statutes. Title 33 Probate Practice and Procedure
Chapter 15 Limited Guardianship and Guardianship of Adults
33-15-18.1.
Rights of persons subject to limited guardianship, guardianship and conservatorship.

Unless specifically authorized by court order, a limited guardian, guardian, or conservator shall not restrict a ward’s right of communication, visitation, or interaction with other persons, including the right to receive visitors, telephone calls, or personal mail. If a ward is unable to express consent to communication, visitation, or interaction with a person due to a physical or mental condition, then consent of the ward may be presumed based on the ward’s prior relationship history with the person.

A limited guardian, guardian, or conservator may, for good cause shown, move the court to have restrictions placed on a person’s ability to communicate, visit, or interact with a ward in accordance with subsection (c) of this section. Good cause means and includes:

Whether any protective orders have been issued to protect the ward from the person seeking access to the ward;

Whether abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of the ward by the person seeking access to the ward has occurred or is likely to occur;

Documented wishes of the ward to reject communication, visitation, or interaction with specific persons; or

Any other factors deemed relevant by the court.

A court may order restrictions placed on the communications, visitations, or interactions a person may have with a ward upon a showing of good cause by the limited guardian, guardian, or conservator.

In determining whether to issue an order in accordance with subsection (c)(1) of this section, the following factors shall be considered by the court:

Whether any protective orders have been issued to protect the ward from the person seeking access to the ward;

Whether the person has been charged with abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of the ward;

Whether the ward expresses a desire to communicate, visit, or interact with the person;

If the ward is unable to communicate, whether a properly executed living will, durable power of attorney, or advance directive contains a preference by the ward with regard to the person’s communication, visitation, or interaction with the ward; and

Any other factors deemed relevant by the court.

Prior to issuing an order pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, the court shall consider the following restrictions in the order listed:

Placing reasonable time, manner, or place restrictions on communication, visitation, or interaction between the ward and another person based on the history between the ward and the person or the ward’s wishes, or both;

Requiring that communication, visitation, or interaction between the ward and another person be supervised; or

Denying communication, visitation, or interaction between the ward and another person, provided, that, unless the court finds that the person poses a threat to the ward, supervised communication, visitation, or interaction under subsection (c)(3)(ii) of this section shall be ordered prior to the denial of any communication, visitation, or interaction.

If any interested person, including the ward, reasonably believes that subsection (a) of this section or an order issued pursuant to subsection (c)(1) of this section has been violated, then such person may move the court to:

Require the limited guardian, guardian, or conservator to grant a person access to the ward;

Restrict, or further restrict, a person’s access to the ward;

Modify the limited guardian, guardian, or conservator’s duties; or

Discharge and replace the limited guardian, guardian, or conservator pursuant to §

33-15-18

.

Notwithstanding actions available to the court pursuant to subsection (d)(1) of this section, a limited guardian, guardian, or conservator who is found to be knowingly isolating a ward and who has violated subsection (a) of this section or an order issued pursuant to subsection (c) of this section shall be subject to discharge and replacement pursuant to §

33-15-18

.

Except as provided in subsection (e)(2) of this section, the court shall schedule a hearing on a motion filed pursuant to subsection (b) or (d) of this section no later than thirty (30) days after the date the motion is filed. The court may, in its discretion, order mediation to be conducted between the parties and the ward prior to the hearing. If mediation results in agreement of the parties and the ward with regard to communication, visitation, or interaction with the ward, the agreement shall be approved and memorialized in an order by the court.

If the motion states that the ward’s health is in significant decline or that the ward’s death may be imminent, the court shall conduct an emergency hearing as soon as practicable, but no later than ten (10) days after the motion is filed.

When a scheduling order is issued for a motion filed pursuant to subsection (e)(2)(i) of this section, the court shall also order that supervised communication, visitation, or interaction with the ward be granted during the period prior to the hearing.

Notice of the hearing, a copy of the motion, and a copy of any order issued pursuant to subsection (e)(2)(ii) of this section, if applicable, shall be personally served upon the ward and any person against whom the motion is filed, and nothing in this section shall affect the ward’s right to appear and be heard in the proceedings.

The court may award the prevailing party in any action brought under this section court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees; provided, however, that an award of court costs or attorney’s fees shall not be paid out of the ward’s estate.

The court, upon motion or upon its own initiative, shall impose upon a limited guardian, guardian, or conservator who is found to be knowingly isolating a ward and who has violated subsection (a) of this section or an order issued pursuant to subsection (c) of this section an appropriate sanction, including an order to pay court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees of the other party or parties; provided, however, that no sanction shall be paid out of the ward’s estate.

A limited guardian, guardian, or conservator shall promptly notify a ward’s closest relatives and any person designated by the ward to be notified, along with the appropriate contact information and upon the limited guardian, guardian, or conservator’s knowledge of such event and information, in the event:

The ward’s residence has changed;

The ward is staying at a location other than the ward’s residence for more than seven (7) consecutive days;

The ward is admitted to or discharged from a nursing home or assisted-care living facility as defined in §§

23-17-2

and

23-17.4-2

;

The ward is admitted to a medical facility for:

Emergency care in response to a life-threatening injury or medical condition; or

Acute care; or

The ward dies, provided, that notification of the ward’s death shall be made in person or by telephone.

A limited guardian, guardian, or conservator is not required to provide notice in accordance with subsection (g) of this section if:

A person who is entitled to notice under subsection (g) of this section informs the limited guardian, guardian, or conservator, in writing, that the person does not wish to receive such notice; or

The ward or a court order has expressly prohibited the limited guardian, guardian, or conservator from providing notice to the person.

A limited guardian, guardian, or conservator shall not provide contact information in accordance with subsection (g) of this section if an order of protection or restraining order has been issued against the person on behalf of the ward.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 225, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 244, § 1.

33-15-19.
Inventory and appraisement of estate.

Within thirty (30) days after his or her appointment, or any longer time that may be allowed by the probate court, a temporary guardian, guardian, or limited guardian shall return to the probate court, under oath, an inventory and appraisement of all the real and personal property of his or her ward, as of the date of the guardian’s qualification to be made by either the guardian and/or a suitable, disinterested person or persons appointed by the court. The appraisers shall be sworn to the faithful discharge of their trust.

In appraising the ward’s interest in any assets held by the ward jointly or in some other form of concurrent ownership with another party, the appraiser shall include on the inventory an explanation for the basis for appraising the inventory, as either all, none, or a portion of the value of the assets.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1059; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 19; P.L. 1915, ch. 1260, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-19

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 9; P.L. 2000, ch. 427, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 417, § 1.

33-15-20.
Statements of claims against estate.

Creditors of a ward shall file statements of their claims in the office of the probate clerk. Those claims filed within six (6) months, if allowed or proved, shall be preferred in payment over all claims subsequently filed. Claims filed after six (6) months shall be payable only out of the surplus property remaining in the hands of the limited guardian or guardian after paying claims filed within the time and all expenses and all allowances made by the court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1060; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-20

; P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 3.

33-15-21.
Demands payable in future.

All legal demands against the ward, although due at a future day, may be filed and be payable with other claims, deducting interest for the anticipated payment.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1061; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-21

.

33-15-22.
Addresses of creditors — Affidavit to support claim.

Every creditor shall file his or her post office address in the office of the probate clerk, and, if requested, an affidavit in support of his or her claim, in the same manner as is provided in the case of claims against estates of deceased persons.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1062; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-22

; P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 3.

33-15-23.
Notice of disallowance of claims.

Within thirty (30) days after the expiration of the six (6) months, the limited guardian or guardian shall file in the office of the probate clerk a statement disallowing any of the claims filed as he or she intends to contest, and shall give notice in writing, either personally or by registered or certified mail, to claimants whose claims are disallowed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1063; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 22; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3717, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-23

; P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 3.

33-15-24.
Period after notice of claims disallowance during which actions barred — Amount to which creditor entitled — Service on limited guardian or guardian.

No action shall be brought or prosecuted against any person under limited guardianship or guardianship within seven (7) months after the first publication of the notice. A creditor shall be entitled to his or her whole claim if the estate, is solvent, or a dividend if the estate should prove insolvent, upon any sum as he or she may be allowed or recover. The party bringing suit, in addition to the service of the original writ, shall cause a true copy thereof to be served upon the limited guardian or guardian.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1064; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-24

; P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 3.

33-15-25.
Action on limited guardian’s or guardian’s bond.

If a limited guardian or guardian shall neglect to return a true inventory of his or her ward’s estate, or shall neglect to apply the real and personal estate of his or her ward to the payment of the ward’s debts, it shall be deemed a breach of his or her bond, and he or she and his or her sureties shall be liable to an action on the bond by any creditor or person interested, and judgment shall be entered in the action, execution shall issue, and recovery shall be had in like manner as on administration bonds.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1065; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-25

; P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 3.

33-15-26.
Annual account.

A limited guardian or guardian with authority to make decisions regarding the ward’s estate, shall return to the probate court, in every year, his or her account, in the same manner as executors and administrators are by law required to do. The probate court shall monitor each limited guardianship or guardianship file. If the court finds that an annual accounting has not been filed, the court shall cite the limited guardian or guardian and demand that an accounting be filed within thirty (30) days. If the limited guardian or guardian fails to comply with the citation for thirty (30) days, without sufficient excuse, the limited guardian or guardian shall be accountable for the full value of the estate and property of his or her ward over which he or she had authority, and shall have no compensation; but the court may, upon the application of the limited guardian or guardian, excuse him or her from rendering an account in any year if satisfied that it is not necessary or expedient that it should be rendered.

Notwithstanding any provision of the general laws to the contrary, no municipality, its officers, and/or employees, individually or otherwise, shall be held civilly liable for failure to monitor guardianship estates.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1066; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 26; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-26

; P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 3; P.L. 1995, ch. 274, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 8.

33-15-26.1.
Annual status report.

A limited guardian or guardian with authority to make decisions regarding the ward’s person shall return to the probate court, in every year, the annual status report, in the form as shown in §

33-15-47

, regarding the status of the ward. The report shall include the following information:

The residence of the ward;

The condition of the ward;

Any changes the limited guardian or guardian perceives in the decision making capacity of the ward; and

A summary of actions taken and decisions made on behalf of the ward by the limited guardian or guardian.

The probate court shall monitor each limited guardianship or guardianship file. If the court finds that the required annual status report has not been filed, the court shall cite the limited guardian or guardian and demand that the status report be filed within thirty (30) days.

The probate court may waive the requirement of an annual status report, if, for good cause shown, such waiver is warranted.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 4; P.L. 1994, ch. 359, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 331, § 1.

33-15-27.
Allowances to limited guardian or guardians.

Probate courts are authorized to allow in the settlement of the accounts of any limited guardian or guardian such reasonable sums as the limited guardian or guardian shall have paid for the suitable support of his or her ward and the ward’s family, and also a reasonable compensation to the limited guardian or guardian for his or her services. It is permissible for a limited guardian or guardian to decline compensation, and shall not be grounds for removal of the limited guardian or guardian.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1067; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 27; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-27

; P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 3.

33-15-28.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1068; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 27; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 27; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-28

; Repealed by P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 1, effective July 21, 1992.

33-15-29.
General duties of limited guardians or guardians with respect to person and estate.

Every limited guardian or guardian with authority to make decisions with respect to the person of his or her ward shall exercise authority in the best interest of his or her ward. Every limited guardian or guardian with authority to make decisions with respect to the estate of his or her ward shall manage the estate frugally, without waste, and shall apply the income and profits from the estate, or so much thereof as may be necessary and proper, to the support and maintenance of the ward and his or her household and family.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1069; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 29; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 28; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-29

; P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 3.

Parties to Actions.

Although the statutes do not expressly provide for actions involving real estate, such actions must be maintained in the name of the ward by his guardian. Hamilton v. Colwell,

10 R.I. 39

,

1871 R.I. LEXIS 8

(1871).

33-15-30.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, §§ 1053, 1054; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, §§ 13, 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, §§ 13, 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, §§ 13, 14; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-30

; Repealed by P.L. 1985, ch. 156, § 2, effective July 1, 1985.

33-15-31.
Application of personal property to debts — Priority of claims.

A limited guardian or guardian with authority to make decisions regarding the ward’s personal property shall collect all the personal property of his or her ward over which he or she has authority and sell and apply the personal property or so much as shall be necessary, at the time and in the manner as the probate court shall direct, to the payment of all the debts of his or her ward; but if the personal property shall be insufficient to pay the debts in full, then he or she shall pay the debts ratably; except that debts due to the United States, debts due to this state, and state and city or town taxes shall be paid first and in the order in which they are named.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 3.

33-15-32.
Sale or mortgage of real estate.

If the personal property in the hands of a limited guardian or guardian is insufficient to pay the debts of his or her ward, including incumbrances on the ward’s estate, and the expense of supporting the ward and his or her family, and if the limited guardian or guardian has authority to make decisions regarding the ward’s real property, the limited guardian or guardian may be authorized by the probate court to sell, or to mortgage for an amount decreed, the real property of his or her ward or any interest therein for the purpose of paying debts. A limited guardian or guardian may also be authorized to sell the real estate of his or her ward or any interest in real estate for the purpose of making a better investment or for any other proper purpose.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 736; G.L. 1909, ch. 308, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 359, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 570, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-32

; P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 3.

33-15-33.
Sale of personal property.

A limited guardian or guardian with authority to make decisions regarding the ward’s personal property may make application for the sale of the personal property of his or her ward, or any of it, for better or more advantageous investment, or for the support of the ward and the ward’s family, or for any other purpose beneficial to the ward, and for incidental charges. The application may be granted by the court of probate without notice. The probate court shall prescribe the manner in which the property shall be advertised and sold, and, in case of private sale, the minimum price. From the order granting the application, there shall be no appeal.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1071; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 31; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 30; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 30; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-33

; P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 3.

33-15-34.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1072; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 32; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 31; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 31; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-34

; Repealed by P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 1, effective July 21, 1992.

33-15-35.
Investment of surplus funds — Relief from bond requirements.

Limited guardians or guardians may be authorized to invest any money in their hands, not needed for the payment of debts, or for the support, or education of their wards, in notes secured by mortgage upon unincumbered, improved real estate situated in this state, or in the bonds or other indebtedness of the United States or of this state, or in the bonds or notes of any city or town in this state, or in the stock of any domestic building and loan association or federal savings and loan association doing business in this state approved by the probate court, or to make deposits of money in any savings bank or trust company in this state approved by the probate court, as he or she shall deem best for the interest of his or her ward. Limited guardians or guardians may also, under the direction of the probate court, invest any money in real estate or bank stocks in this state or in any other safe income producing securities as the probate court may approve; and if a limited guardian or guardian has so deposited any money in any savings bank or trust company or invested money in stock of any association and deposited with the clerk of the probate court the savings bankbook, share certificate or other evidence of deposit or investment, to be held subject to the order of the court, the probate court in its discretion may relieve the limited guardian or guardian of the requirement of surety on his or her bond if the deposit or investment is not in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and constitutes all of the property of his or her ward, or if there be other property, reduce the amount of his or her bond by the amount of the deposit or investment, but by not in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1073; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 33; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 32; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 32; P.L. 1955, ch. 3495, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-35

; P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 3.

33-15-36.
Powers of limited guardian or guardian with respect to corporate stock.

Whenever the ward is the owner of stock in any corporation, and the limited guardianship or guardianship order so authorizes, the limited guardian or guardian shall have and exercise on behalf of his or her ward all the rights and powers of voting, either personally or by proxy, the right of examination of books, and all other rights incident to ownership.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1074; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 34; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 33; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 33; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-36

; P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 3.

33-15-37.
Support of dependents for whom ward has no legal obligation to provide.

Whenever a limited guardian or guardian or a conservator of the estate of any person is appointed by any court in this state and the person has, prior to the appointment of the limited guardian or guardian or conservator, provided for any other person out of his or her estate, whom the ward was not under legal obligations to support or provide for, and where it appears that the ward would have continued support or provision if the limited guardian or guardian or conservator had not been appointed, the superior or probate court, upon complaint filed by the person who received the support or provision or by the limited guardian or guardian or conservator, may authorize the limited guardian or guardian or conservator to continue to make allowances out of the estate of the ward, as the court in its sound discretion deems the ward would have made if a limited guardian or guardian or conservator had not been appointed. Provided, however, that the court shall not exercise this power in cases where the ward has prior to the appointment of a limited guardian or guardian or conservator expressly declared or requested that these powers shall not be exercised by the court. In granting the authority, the court may impose conditions or restrictions and, give such directions as it may deem advisable.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 372, § 44, as enacted by P.L. 1923, ch. 475, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 38; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-37

; P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 9.

33-15-37.1.
Minimization of taxes — Estate planning.

The superior or probate court, upon the petition of a conservator, limited guardian or guardian, other than the guardian of a minor, and after notice by publication as the court directs and other notice to all persons interested, may authorize the conservator, limited guardian or guardian to exercise any and all powers over the estate and business affairs of the ward which the ward could exercise if present and not under disability. The court may authorize the taking of such action, or the application of any funds as are not required for the ward’s own maintenance and support, in any fashion as the court shall approve as being in keeping with the ward’s wishes, so far as they can be ascertained, or which the conservator, guardian or limited guardian can demonstrate is in the best interest of the ward. In ascertaining and carrying out the ward’s wishes, or in determining which actions are in the ward’s best interests, the court may consider, but shall not be limited to minimization of current or prospective state or federal income, estate and inheritance taxes, and providing for gifts to charities, relatives and friends as would be likely recipients of donations or future inheritances from the ward.

This action or application of funds may include, but shall not be limited to, the making of gifts, to the conveyance or release of the ward’s contingent and expectant interests in property including marital property rights, and any right of survivorship incident to joint tenancy or tenancy by the entirety, to the exercise or release of the ward’s powers as donee of a power of appointment, the making of contracts, the creation of revocable or irrevocable trusts of property of the ward’s estate which may extend beyond the ward’s disability or life and for which the ward may or may not be a beneficiary, the exercise of options of the ward to purchase securities or other property, the exercise of the ward’s right to elect options and to change beneficiaries under insurance and annuity policies, and the surrendering of policies for their cash value, the exercise of the ward’s right to an elective share in the estate of the ward’s deceased spouse, and the renunciation or disclaimer of any interest acquired by testate or intestate succession or by inter vivos transfer.

The guardian, limited guardian or conservator in the petition shall briefly outline the action or application of funds for which approval is sought, the results expected to be accomplished thereby and the tax savings, if any, expected to accrue. The proposed action or application of funds may include gifts of the ward’s personal property or real estate. Gifts may be for the benefit of prospective legatees, devisees or heirs apparent of the ward, or may be made to individuals or charities in which the ward is believed to have an interest. The conservator, limited guardian or guardian shall also indicate in the petition that any planned disposition is consistent with the intentions of the ward insofar as they can be ascertained, or are otherwise in the best interest of the ward. If the ward’s intentions cannot be ascertained, the ward will be presumed to favor reduction in the incidence of the various forms of taxation, and the partial distribution of the ward’s estate during his or her lifetime, as provided in this section. The conservator, limited guardian or guardian shall not, however, be required to include as a beneficiary any person whom there is reason to believe would be excluded by the ward.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 306, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 9.

33-15-38.
Powers unimpaired by §§ 33-15-37 and 33-15-37.1.

Nothing contained in §§

33-15-37

or

33-15-37

.1 shall be held to limit or restrict any powers which a limited guardian, guardian, or conservator may have apart from the provisions of those sections.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 372, § 45, as enacted by P.L. 1923, ch. 475, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 39; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-38

; P.L. 1982, ch. 306, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 3.

33-15-39.
Representation of incompetents and contingent interests in proceedings under § 33-15-37 or 33-15-37.1.

Whenever in any proceeding under §

33-15-37

or

33-15-37

.1 there are contingent interests of persons not in being, or not ascertainable, or interests of persons non sui juris, the court may appoint a person to represent those contingent interests, or a guardian ad litem to represent the interests of persons non sui juris, and in case of representation under this section the judgment, order, or decree entered in the proceeding shall bind all the interests.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 372, § 46, as enacted by P.L. 1923, ch. 475, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 40; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-39

; P.L. 1982, ch. 306, § 2.

33-15-40.
Appeal to supreme court from proceedings under §§ 33-15-37 and 33-15-37.1.

An appeal may be taken to the supreme court from any final order, judgment, or decree of the superior court entered in any proceeding brought under the provisions of §

33-15-37

or

33-15-37

.1 at any time within twenty (20) days from the entry of the order, judgment, or decree, and not thereafter.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 372, § 47, as enacted by P.L. 1923, ch. 475, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 41; P.L. 1939, ch. 659, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-40

; P.L. 1982, ch. 306, § 2.

33-15-41.
Applicability of §§ 33-15-37 — 33-15-40.

The provisions of §§

33-15-37

—

33-15-40

shall apply to any estate where a limited guardian, a guardian, or a conservator has been appointed whether prior to June 13th, 1923, or thereafter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1923, ch. 475, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 42; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-41

; P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 3.

33-15-42.
Removal of property by nonresident guardian.

In all cases where a guardian and his or her ward are both nonresidents in this state and the ward is entitled to property of any description in this state, the guardian, on producing satisfactory proof to the probate court of the city or town where any property is situated, by certificates duly authenticated according to an act of congress in such cases, that he or she has given bond and security in the state in which he or she and his or her ward reside in double the value of the property of the ward, and it is found that a removal of the property will not prejudice the interest of any other person in the property, then the guardian may demand, sue for, recover, and remove any property to the place of residence of himself or herself or the ward.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1075; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 35; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 34; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 34; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-42

; P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 3.

33-15-43.
Order to resident guardian to deliver property to nonresident guardian.

Whenever a nonresident guardian shall produce an exemplification, under the seal, if any there be, of the proper court in the state of his or her residence, containing all the entries in relation to his or her appointment and in relation to his or her having given bond, duly authenticated as provided in this chapter, the probate court of the proper town in this state may cause suitable orders to be made, discharging any resident guardian, executor, or administrator and authorizing the delivering and passing over of the property, and also requiring receipts to be passed and filed if deemed advisable; provided, that in all cases thirty (30) days’ notice shall be given to the resident guardian, executor, or administrator of the intended application for the order of removal, and the court may reject the application and refuse the order whenever it is satisfied it is for the interest of the ward, or of any other person having a right in the property that the removal shall not take place.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1076; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 36; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 35; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 35; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-43

; P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 3.

33-15-44.
Conservator for incompetent person — Disability to contract.

If a person, by reason of disability or upon his or her own election, is unable to properly care for his or her property, the probate court of the town in which he or she resides, upon his or her petition, or the petition of one or more of his or her relatives or friends, may appoint a conservator of his or her property. Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall appoint a time and place for a hearing, and shall cause at least fourteen (14) days’ notice of the hearing to be given to the person for whom a conservator is to be appointed if he or she is not the petitioner. If, at the hearing, it appears that the person is incapable of properly caring for his or her property, a conservator shall be appointed, who shall have the charge and management of the property of the person subject to the direction of the court. No person convicted of a felony offense involving a charge of forgery, embezzlement, obtaining money under false pretenses, bribery, larceny, extortion, conspiracy to defraud, burglary, breaking and entering, or any other offense involving fraud or theft shall be qualified for appointment as a conservator. The conservator may be discharged by the probate court upon the application of the ward, or otherwise, when it appears that the conservatorship is no longer necessary. After the filing of the petition, the person shall be under the same disability to contract as a person for whom an application for guardianship has been made is under by virtue of the provisions of §

33-15-13

.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1077; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 37; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 36; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 36; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-44

; P.L. 1985, ch. 156, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 122, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 380, § 1.

33-15-45.
Conservator’s bond and inventory — Management and accounting.

A conservator shall give bond and file inventory as is required of guardians of estates. All provisions of law relating to accounting and to the management, investment, sale, lease, or mortgage by guardians of estates shall apply to the accounting and to the management, investment, sale, lease, or mortgage of estates by conservators.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1078; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 38; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 37; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 37; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-45

.

33-15-46.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 126, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 1, effective July 21, 1992.